District of Columbia statutes.
5-1331

Establishment.

The National Law Enforcement Officers Memorial Fund, Inc., is authorized to establish the National Law Enforcement Heroes Memorial on federal land in the District of Columbia or its environs to honor law enforcement officers who die in the line of duty.

May 23, 1989, D.C. Law 8-2, § 2, 36 DCR 2371

History

1981 Ed., § 4-1121.

Prior Codifications